src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON EADDJI-NomAg !!≈ * **@CODE@** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG  tagged NomAg. Sometimes long compound-forms
         :eaddji¤ ACTORLONGSHORT ;
+Err/Orth:eddji¤ ACTORLONGSHORT ;
+Err/Orth:eadji¤ ACTORLONGSHORT ;
+NomAg+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:eaddje K ;


LEXICON ACTORLONGSHORT !!≈ * **@CODE@** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG
! +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG: ACTORLONGSHORTCT ; ! SNM 16.4.2014: commented out
! since it is specified for each entry, and not always the same - no compound
! specification instead:
 ACTORLONGSHORTCT-nomag ;


LEXICON ACTORLONGSHORTCT-nomag !!≈ * **@CODE@** adds +NomAg
 +NomAg: ACTORLONGSHORTCT ;

LEXICON ACTORLONGSHORTCT !!≈ * **@CODE@** nowadays tagged NomAg. Sometimes long compound-forms
 :%> GOAHTILONGSHORTCMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon dipth simpl
 !+Use/NG:%>W9 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon optional dipth simpl
! +Use/NG:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon  no dipth simpl
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 +Use/NG:X5%> GODII- ; ! optional dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +Cmp/SgGen:%>X8 R ; ! Ditto (?)

LEXICON ACTORSHORT !!≈ * **@CODE@** +CmpN/SgN +CmpN/SgG +CmpN/PlG
 ACTORSHORTCT ; ! Removed +CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG: since it is specified
                ! in the stems lexicon for every stem having this contlex.
                ! The tags breaks the tag reordering regex.

LEXICON ACTORSHORTCT !!≈ * **@CODE@** nowadays tagged NomAg. Short compound-forms
  +NomAg+Cmp/SgNom:%>X7 flagON-R ;
 +NomAg+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:%> flagOFF-R ;
 +NomAg+Sg+Nom: K ;
 +NomAg+Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +NomAg+Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +NomAg+Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 +NomAg:%> EssV ;
 +NomAg:%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +NomAg:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon dipth simpl
 +NomAg+Use/NG:%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon optional dipth simpl
! +NomAg+Use/NG:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon  no dipth simpl
 +NomAg+Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +NomAg+Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +NomAg+Sg+Gen:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +NomAg+Sg+Acc:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +NomAg+Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +NomAg+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +NomAg+Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> NPxC ;
 +NomAg+Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
 +NomAg+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:%>X4k K ;
 +NomAg+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth: R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +NomAg+Use/NG:X5%> GODII- ; ! optional dipth simpl
 +NomAg:%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; !  dipth simpl
 +NomAg:%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
! +NomAg:%>X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)

!LEXICON ACTORLEX  lexicalized actors because we have restricted verb derivation for speller. Long compound-forms
! :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
! +Sg+Nom: K ;
! +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
! +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđá K ;
! +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđi K ;
! :%> EssV ;
! :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
! :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon   dipth simpl
! +Use/NG:%>W9 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon   optional dipth simpl
!! +Use/NG:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon     no dipth simpl
! :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
! +Use/NG:X5%> GODII- ; ! optional dipth simpl
! :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; !  dipth simpl
! :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px





!!!!!   2g. Action nouns
! - - - - - - - ----------------------------------------

LEXICON BOAHTALADDAN   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Intransitiv Action nouns from deverbal verbs
< "+N":0 "@C.NeedNoun@" > BOAHTALADDANcase ;
 BOAHTALADDAN_dihte ;

LEXICON PRE_BOAHTALADDAN
 @C.NeedNoun@ BOAHTALADDANcase ;
 BOAHTALADDAN_dihte ;

LEXICON BOAHTALADDAN_dihte
% dihte+Err/MissingSpace:∑#dihte adv ; !ealáskahttin dihte
% dihte+Err/Orth+Err/MissingSpace:∑#dihti adv ; !ealáskahttin dihte
% dihte+Err/MissingSpace:∑#dihtii adv ; !ealáskahttin dihte
! The following two forms should probably be tagged with +Use/GC, but
! it turns out we remove such forms from the grammar checker generator - I
! don't know why yet, so instead I just don't use it here. It means that the
! analysers will analyse all 'X dihte' and 'X dihtii' sequences as one token.
% dihte:#% dihte adv  ; ! We also need the correct form
% dihte:#% dihtii adv ; ! so that we can generate it as a suggestion


LEXICON IHTALUDDAMAT   !!≈ * **@CODE@**  ihtaluddamat, plural
 +Cmp/SgNom:# VEARA ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%> R ;
 +Ess:%>in K ;
 +Ess+Err/Orth:%>en K ;   !SDialects
! +Ess:%>e K ; !not for nouns
 +Pl+Nom:%>at K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%>ijd K ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>ijd R ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijdda K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>ijnna K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>ijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Com:%>ijgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%>ij∑- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddá%> NPx1V ;
! +Pl+Nom:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ; !^P^
 +Pl+Gen:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Acc:%>ijddi%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:%>ijddás%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:%>ijnni%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Com:%>ijddi%> NPxPlComV1 ;


LEXICON EAPMI_default_sem
+Sem/Act: EAPMI_flag ;


LEXICON EAPMI_lex_sem
: EAPMI_flag ;

LEXICON UPMI !!≈ * **@CODE@** action noun, from passive verb
          +Cmp/SgNom:upme             flagON-R  ;
          +Cmp/SgNom:upmi             flagOFF-R ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:upme%>X4         flagON-R  ;
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:upmi%>X4         flagOFF-R ;
 +Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5jd       R         ;
 +Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:upmi%>%^DISIMPjd R         ;

 +Sg+Nom:upmi K ;
! +Sg+Nom:upmi%> NPx3V ;
 +Ess:upmi%>n K ;
 +Ess:upmi%>n%> NPxC ;
 :upmi%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Err/Orth:upmi%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :upmi%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen:upmi%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:upmi%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:upmi%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:upmi%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Loc:upmi%>X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:upmi%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:upmi%>X4st%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:upmi%>X4t K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:upmi%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5jn%> NPxC ;
 +Sg+Com:upmi%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5jd%> NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Nom:upmi%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPx1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:upmi%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Gen:upmi%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:upmi%>%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5jd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Acc:upmi%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:upmi%>%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5jdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Ill:upmi%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch ;
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:upmi%>%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5js K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:upmi%>%^DISIMPjs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5jn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Loc:upmi%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:upmi%>%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5j∑- ENDLEX ;  !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com/Sh:upmi%>%^DISIMPj∑- ENDLEX ;  !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5jd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:upmi%>X5jn%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com:upmi%>%^DISIMPjd%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Err/Orth:upmi%>%^DISIMPjn%> NPxPlComC ;
 +Sg+Gen+Allegro+Use/NG:upmi%>X8 K ; !
 :upmi%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px





!!!!!   2h. Plural nouns
! - - - - - - - ----------------------------------------


LEXICON EGEZHAGAT !!≈ * **@CODE@**  reciprocals like verddežagat, jumežagat etc
       +Cmp/SgNom:%>          R          ;
         +Sg+Gen:a%>X4       K          ;
 +Sg+Gen:a%>X4       NPx1V       ;
         +Pl+Nom:a%>X4t      K          ;
            +Ess:a%>n        K          ;
    +Ess:a%>n%>      NPxC        ;
        +Err/Orth:a%>X5       EGEZHAHKII ;
                :a%>%^DISIMP EGEZHAHKII ;
