src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounNoPx   !!= * **@CODE@** here goes nouns not taking Px.
burežagat+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:burežahºk EGEZHAGAT ;
gáimmežagat+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gáimmežahºk EGEZHAGAT ;
oarpmeležagat+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:oarpmeležahºk EGEZHAGAT ;
áhčežagat+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:áhčežahºk EGEZHAGAT ;
LEXICON NounPx  !!= * **@CODE@** this is the main noun lexicon
birasgáhttenbálkkašupmi+N+Sem/Prod:biras#gáhtten#bálkkaš UPMI ;
boastageavaheaddji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:boasta#geavah EADDJI-NomAg ;
boasttugeavaheapmi+N+MWE+Err/SpaceCmp+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:boasttu% geavah EAPMI_default_sem ;
deaivvadeapmi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Event:deaivvad EAPMI_lex_sem ;
doavttirgrádalassáneapmi+N+CmpN/SgN:doavttir#gráda#lassán EAPMI_default_sem ;
duopmároahpaheaddji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:duopmár#oahpaheaddji¤ ACTORSHORT ;
duottarstobudoalli+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:duottar#stobu#doalli¤ ACTORLONGSHORT ;
dutkanlonohallan+CmpN/SgN:dutkan#lonohallam BOAHTALADDAN ;
dálkemolsašupmi+N+Sem/Dummytag:dálke#molsaš UPMI ;
ealáhusbuhtadeapmi+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Money:ealáhus#buhtad EAPMI_lex_sem ;
ealáhusdoaimmaheaddji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:ealáhus#doaimmah EADDJI-NomAg ;
eavttuidbiddji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:eavttuid9#biddji¤ ACTORLONGSHORT ;
gaskkaldupmi+N+Sem/Dummytag:gaskkald UPMI ;
geavaheddjiidáittardeaddji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:geavaheddjiid9#áittard EADDJI-NomAg ;
gierrásaččat+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Group_Hum:gierrásažž EGEZHAGAT ;
gikcunoahpaheaddji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:gikcun#oahpaheaddji¤ ACTORSHORT ;
goarradeaivvadeapmi+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Event:goarra#deaivvad EAPMI_lex_sem ;
guohtunárvvoštallan+CmpN/SgN:guohtun#árvvoštallam BOAHTALADDAN ;
guorbmebiilajorri+N+Sem/Veh:guorbme#biila#jorri¤ ACTORLONGSHORT ;
guovddášlogaldalli+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:guovddáš#logaldalli¤ ACTORLONGSHORT ;
guovllustivrejupmi+N+Err/Orth-nom-gen+Sem/Dummytag:guovlo#stivrej UPMI ;
guovžahálddašeapmi+N+CmpN/SgN:guovža#hálddaš EAPMI_default_sem ;
gávpejeaddji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Err/Lex+Sem/Hum:gávpej EADDJI-NomAg ;
konsultašundeaivvadeapmi+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Event:konsultašun#deaivvad EAPMI_lex_sem ;
kursalogaldalli+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:kursa#logaldalli¤ ACTORLONGSHORT ;
kursaoahpaheaddji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:kursa#oahpaheaddji¤ ACTORSHORT ;
linnjarehkenastin+CmpN/SgN:linnja#rehkenastim BOAHTALADDAN ;
luoddadoalli+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:luodda#doalli¤ ACTORLONGSHORT ;
measttirgilvvohallamat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Event:measttir#gilvvohallam IHTALUDDAMAT ;
meašttirgilvvohallamat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Event:meašttir#gilvvohallam IHTALUDDAMAT ;
meaštárgilvvohallamat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Event:meaštár#gilvvohallam IHTALUDDAMAT ;
meaštárgilvvohallamat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Event:meaštár#gilvvohallam IHTALUDDAMAT ;
mieđiheapmi+N+CmpN/SgN:mieđih EAPMI_default_sem ;
mobiilageavaheaddji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:mobiila#geavah EADDJI-NomAg ;
máidnojupmi+N+Sem/Dummytag:máidnoj UPMI ;
oappážagat+N+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:oappážahºk EGEZHAGAT ;
ohcangieđahallan+CmpN/SgN:ohcan#gieđahallam BOAHTALADDAN ;
pizzadeaivvadeapmi+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Event:pizza#deaivvad EAPMI_lex_sem ;
rievttesoahpaheaddji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:rievttes#oahpaheaddji¤ ACTORSHORT ;
rusttetjođiheaddji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:rusttet#jođih EADDJI-NomAg ;
ráiggaheapmi+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft:ráiggah EAPMI_default_sem ; !piercing
skirvehárjehallan+CmpN/SgN:skirvehárjehallam BOAHTALADDAN ;
sosiálaoahpaheaddji+N+Sem/Hum_Pos+Err/Orth:sosiál#oahpaheaddji¤ ACTORSHORT ;
sámemeašttirgilvvohallamat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Event:sáme#meašttir#gilvvohallam IHTALUDDAMAT ;
sámemeaštárgilvvohallamat+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Event:sáme#meaštár#gilvvohallam IHTALUDDAMAT ;
sárdnojupmi+N+Sem/Dummytag:sárdnoj UPMI ;
valáštallanoahpaheaddji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:valáštallan#oahpaheaddji¤ ACTORSHORT ;
váhnenságastallan+CmpN/SgN:váhnen#ságastallam BOAHTALADDAN ;
váldojođiheaddji+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:váldo#jođih EADDJI-NomAg ;
váldologaldalli+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum_Pos:váldo#logaldalli¤ ACTORLONGSHORT ;
áibbašupmi+N+Sem/Act:áibbaš UPMI ;
árvobidjanvealaheapmi+N+CmpN/SgN:árvo#bidjan#vealah EAPMI_default_sem ;
ávvudančoagganeapmi+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Event:ávvudan#čoaggan EAPMI_lex_sem ;
